Utah statutes.
17-50-403.   Action on rejected claim -- Limitation.
(1)  A claimant dissatisfied with the rejection of a claim or demand or with
the amount allowed on an account may sue the county on the claim, demand, or
account at any time within one year after the first rejection of the claim,
demand, or account by the county executive, but not afterward.
(2)  If in such action judgment is recovered for more than the county
executive allowed, costs shall be taxed against the county, but if no more is
recovered than the county executive allowed, costs shall be taxed against the
plaintiff.
(3)  On presentation of a certified copy of a judgment against the county, the
county executive shall allow and pay the same.
